Maine, session 132, LD1709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §1, is
further amended to read:
A. More than 35 25 years old or is 35 years old or less and more than 25 years old and
was registered in the State as an antique vehicle prior to January 2025;
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §457, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §3, is
further amended to read:
A. Is over 25 years old or, in the case of an antique auto or antique motorcycle, is more
than 35 years old or is more than 25 years old and was registered in the State as an
antique auto or antique motorcycle prior to January 2025;
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §457, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Additional requirements for antique autos. A person registering an antique auto
shall show proof of registration and insurance for the motor vehicle used as that person's
primary mode of transportation of passengers or goods and shall maintain the registration
and insurance for that motor vehicle or a replacement motor vehicle during the term of
registration of the antique auto. A person may not operate an antique auto when a motor
vehicle used as that person's primary mode of transportation of passengers or goods is not
registered and insured. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for
which a fine of not more than $2,500 may be adjudged and for which the Secretary of State
may immediately revoke the registration for the antique auto.